Tennessee, session 114, HB1440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 467 of the Private Acts of 1951, as amended by Chapter 233 of
the Private Acts of 1976, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting the
following language in Section 1:
At the August election 1952, there shall be elected by the qualified voters of said
county some person as County Attorney, who shall be a licensed practicing attorney,
who shall hold office for a period of four years and until his successor shall be elected
and qualified. He shall take office upon September 1 next following his election. To fill
the vacancy occasioned by the creation of such office, Geo. W. Dagley is hereby named
as such County Attorney to serve until September 1, 1952.
and substituting instead:
The County Attorney shall be a licensed practicing attorney who is appointed or
hired subject to a vote of the Morgan County Commission to serve a term of four years.
The County Attorney does not need to be a resident of Morgan County to serve as
County Attorney.
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office
or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which such elected official
was selected, as prescribed in Article XI, Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of
Tennessee.
HB1440
007765
- 1 -

SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Morgan County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 2 - 007765